Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Wellness in the Woods for daily peer support and special sessions for individuals who are in substance use recovery, are transitioning out of incarceration, or have experienced trauma. new text end